testing/kca-test-N-xop.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/mrj-gen.hfstol
    Morph: ../bin/kca.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/ikca.fst
    Morph: ../bin/kca.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - хоп: # Noun 'boat'
     хоп+N+Sg+Nom: хоп
     хоп+N+Sg+Lat: хопа
     хоп+N+Sg+Loc: хопӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: хопем
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: хопема
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: хопемӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: хопен
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: хопена
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: хопенӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: хопӆ
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: хопӆа
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: хопӆӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: хопемӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: хопемӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: хопемӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: хопӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: хопӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: хопев
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: хопева
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: хопевӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: хопӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: хопӑӆ
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: хопӑӆа
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: хопӑӆӑн


     хоп+N+Du+Nom: хопӈӑн
     хоп+N+Du+Lat: хопӈӑна
     хоп+N+Du+Loc: хопӈӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: хопӈӑӆам
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: хопӈӑӆама
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: хопӈӑӆамӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: хопӈӑӆан
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: хопӈӑӆана
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: хопӈӑӆанӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: хопӈӑӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: хопӈӑӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: хопӈӑӆаӆӑн


     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: хопӈӑӆӑмӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: хопӈӑӆӑмӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: хопӈӑӆӑмӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: хопӈӑӆӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: хопӈӑӆӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: хопӈӑӆӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: хопӈӑӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: хопӈӑӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: хопӈӑӆаӆӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: хопӈӑӆув
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: хопӈӑӆува
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: хопӈӑӆувӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: хопӈӑӆӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: хопӈӑӆӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: хопӈӑӆӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: хопӈӑӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: хопӈӑӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: хопӈӑӆаӆӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+Nom: хопӑт
     хоп+N+Pl+Lat: хопӑта
     хоп+N+Pl+Loc: хопӑтӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: хопӆам
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: хопӆама
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: хопӆамӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: хопӆан
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: хопӆана
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: хопӆанӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: хопӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: хопӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: хопӆаӆӑн


     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: хопӆӑмӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: хопӆӑмӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: хопӆӑмӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: хопӆӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: хопӆӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: хопӆӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: хопӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: хопӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: хопӆаӆӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: хопӆув
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: хопӆува
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: хопӆувӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: хопӆӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: хопӆӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: хопӆӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: хопӆаӆ
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: хопӆаӆа
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: хопӆаӆӑн
